Massachusetts, session 194th, H1669.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 21D of chapter 40 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 46, the words “three hundred dollars”
and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $1,000.
SECTION 2. Said section 21D of said chapter 40, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by adding the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding this section or any other general or special law to the contrary, in any
suit in equity brought in the superior court, district court or the land court by a city or town, or a
municipal agency, officer, board or commission having enforcement powers on behalf of the city
or town, to enforce an ordinance or by-law, or a rule, regulation or order described in this
section, the court, upon a finding that the violation occurred, may assess a civil penalty in
accordance with this section and section 21, and reasonable attorneys fees and costs. Civil
penalties assessed under this paragraph shall be in addition to any equitable relief ordered by the
of 2

court and shall be paid to the city or town for use as the city or town may determine. In assessing
a penalty under this paragraph, the court shall consider: (1) whether the violation was willful or
negligent; (2) the harm to the public health, safety or environment resulting from the violation;
(3) the economic benefit gained by the defendant as a result of the violation; (4) the cost to the
city or town resulting from the violation; (5) the history of noncompliance by the defendant; and
(6) whether the defendant made good faith efforts to cure or cease the violation of the ordinance
or by-law after the first notice by the city or town of such violation.
of 2